Maryland, session 2026, HB1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 8. MARYLAND LAW ENFORCEMENT PUBLIC SERVICE MEDAL.
3–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “MEDAL” MEANS THE MARYLAND LAW ENFORCEMENT PUBLIC
SERVICE MEDAL.
(C) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND
CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
3–802.
(A) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND LAW ENFORCEMENT PUBLIC SERVICE
MEDAL.
(2) THE MEDAL IS THE HIGHEST STATE HONOR AWARDED TO LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS FOR EXCEPTIONAL PUBLIC SERVICE, VALOR, AND
HEROISM.
(B) (1) THE GOVERNOR MAY AWARD THE MEDAL TO SWORN LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS IN MARYLAND WHO:
(I) HAVE DEMONSTRATED ACTS OF EXTRAORDINARY
COURAGE, BRAVERY, OR SELFLESSNESS WHILE ON DUTY;
(II) HAVE RISKED OR SACRIFICED THEIR LIVES BY SAVING
LIVES, PREVENTING SIGNIFICANT CRIMES, OR RESPONDING TO CRITICAL
EMERGENCIES; OR
(III) HAVE SIGNIFICANTLY IMPACTED PUBLIC SAFETY,
INCLUDING RESPONDING TO DISASTERS, TERRORIST THREATS, OR SIGNIFICANT
PUBLIC EMERGENCIES.

HOUSE BILL 1333 3
(2) THE GOVERNOR MAY AWARD NOT MORE THAN FIVE MEDALS PER
CALENDAR YEAR.
(3) WHEN AN OFFICER IS AWARDED A MEDAL POSTHUMOUSLY, THE
OFFICER’S NEXT OF KIN MAY RECEIVE OFFICIAL RECOGNITION AND
COMMENDATION ON THE OFFICER’S BEHALF.
(C) (1) A MEDAL REVIEW COMMITTEE SHALL BE ESTABLISHED WITHIN
THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES TO
EVALUATE NOMINATIONS AND SELECT RECIPIENTS FOR THE MEDAL.
(2) THE MEDAL REVIEW COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF:
(I) THE SECRETARY, WHO SHALL SERVE AS THE CHAIR OF THE
COMMITTEE;
(II) THE SECRETARY OF STATE POLICE;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND POLICE
TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION, CHOSEN BY THE SECRETARY;
(IV) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, CHOSEN BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(V) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, CHOSEN BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE; AND
(VI) ONE COMMUNITY REPRESENTATIVE WITH EXPERIENCE
WORKING IN LAW ENFORCEMENT OR PUBLIC SAFETY, CHOSEN BY THE SECRETARY.
(3) THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(I) REVIEW NOMINATIONS SUBMITTED BY:
1. STATE AND LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES;
2. STATE AND LOCAL ELECTED OFFICIALS; AND
3. COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS AND CIVILIANS; AND
(II) ANNUALLY SUBMIT A LIST OF NOT MORE THAN FIVE
RECOMMENDED AWARDEES TO THE GOVERNOR FOR FINAL APPROVAL.

HOUSE BILL 1333
(D) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL PRESENT THE MEDALS IN AN OFFICIAL
STATE CEREMONY HELD ANNUALLY IN ANNAPOLIS.
(2) AT THE CEREMONY, EACH MEDAL RECIPIENT SHALL RECEIVE:
(I) A GOLD MEDALLION BEARING THE STATE SEAL;
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF COMMENDATION SIGNED BY THE
GOVERNOR AND THE PRESIDING OFFICERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(III) A PERMANENT MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE HONOR ROLL
LISTING HOUSED AT THE STATE HOUSE.
(E) MEDAL PRODUCTION AND CEREMONY EXPENSES SHALL BE FUNDED
THROUGH:
(1) AN ANNUAL APPROPRIATION CONTAINED IN THE STATE BUDGET;
AND
(2) GRANTS, PRIVATE SPONSORSHIPS, AND LAW ENFORCEMENT
FOUNDATION SUPPORT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the following individuals shall
be awarded the Maryland Law Enforcement Public Service Medal at the first annual
Maryland Law Enforcement Public Service Medal ceremony in recognition of contributions
made during the collapse of the Francis Scott Key Bridge:
(1) Sergeant Paul Pastorek;
(2) Corporal Jeremy Herbert;
(3) Senior Officer William Kinsey;
(4) Officer Timothy Baublitz; and
(5) Officer Garry Kirts.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.